District of Columbia statutes.
11-1730

Reports of court personnel.

(a)

Judges of the courts shall furnish time and attendance records pursuant to sections 11-709 and 11-909 to the respective chief judges, with a copy to the Executive Officer.

(b)

All nonjudicial personnel of the courts shall furnish such reports and information to the Executive Officer as the Executive Officer shall request.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 512, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(89), 108 Stat. 713
1981 Ed., § 11-1730.
1973 Ed., § 11-1730.